North Carolina, session 2025, SB525.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Living Wage
Guarantee Act."
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 95-25.3 reads as rewritten:
"§ 95-25.3. Minimum wage.wages; automatic cost-of-living adjustments.
(a) Every employer employer, except a small business covered under subsection (a1) of
this section, shall pay to each employee who in any workweek performs any work, wages of at
least six dollars and fifteen cents ($6.15) per hour or the minimum wage the amount set forth in
paragraph 1 of section 6(a) of the Fair Labor Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. 206(a)(1), as that wage
may change from time to time, whichever is higher, except as otherwise provided in this
section.or wages of at least fifteen dollars ($15.00) per hour, whichever is higher, effective
January 1, 2026.
(a1) A small business shall pay to each employee who in any workweek performs any
work, wages of at least the amount set forth in paragraph 1 of section 6(a) of the Fair Labor
Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. § 206(a)(1), as that wage may change from time to time, or the wage
set forth in this subsection, whichever is higher:
(1) Effective January 1, 2026, wages of at least twelve dollars ($12.00) per hour.
(2) Effective January 1, 2027, wages of at least thirteen dollars and fifty cents
($13.50) per hour.
(3) Effective January 1, 2028, wages of at least fifteen dollars ($15.00) per hour.
(4) Effective January 1, 2028, and annually thereafter, the amount determined by
the Commissioner of Labor under subsection (a2) of this section.
*S525-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
For the purposes of this section, a "small business" is defined as a person doing business in
this State having fewer than 10 employees.
(a2) Beginning October 1, 2028, and on each October 1 thereafter, the Commissioner of
Labor shall calculate an adjusted minimum wage rate indexed to the percentage increase in the
Consumer Price Index (All 29 Urban Consumers), CPI-U, or its successor index, as calculated
by the U.S. Department of Labor for the 12-month period preceding the previous October 1. Each
adjusted minimum wage rate calculated shall be published on October 1 and take effect on the
following January 1.
…."
SECTION 2.(b) G.S. 95-25.22 is amended by adding new subsections to read:
"(a2) Any employer who violates the provisions of G.S. 95-25.13 or any rule adopted under
that section shall be:
(1) Liable to the employee or employees affected in the amount of their actual
damages, including, but not limited to, back pay and benefits plus interest and
reasonable attorneys' fees and costs.
(2) Subject to fines and other remedies as determined by the North Carolina
Department of Labor.
(a3) Employees shall have the right to file complaints with the Department of Labor
regarding noncompliance. Employers shall not retaliate against employees who assert their rights
under this section."
SECTION 3. Effective July 1, 2025, there is appropriated from the General Fund to
the Department of Labor the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to establish a State-funded
Small Business Assistance Program (Program). The Program shall: (i) provide temporary
financial support to small businesses transitioning to the new wage requirements and (ii) engage
in outreach about the new minimum wage law. Federal workforce development funds may also
be used for this purpose. Financial support through the Program shall be made available for
businesses with 20 or fewer employees for a period of up to two years. The Department of Labor
shall develop rules for the administration of the Program.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 525-First Edition